Massachusetts, session 194th, HD6287.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1. Pursuant to Article 97 of the Amendments to the Constitution of the 
Commonwealth of Massachusetts and notwithstanding any provisions of any general or special 
law to the contrary, the Town of Nantucket acting by and through its Conservation Commission, 
is hereby authorized to convey a certain parcel of land situated at 35 Grove Lane, shown as Lot 
5, on a plan of land recorded with the Nantucket County Registry of Deeds in Plan File 8-A, 
owned by the Town of Nantucket pursuant to a Deed recorded with the Nantucket County 
Registry of Deeds in Book 164, Page 228, to the Town of Nantucket acting by and through its 
Select Board for purposes of conveyance. 
Section 2. Pursuant to Article 97 of the Amendments to the Constitution of the 
Commonwealth of Massachusetts and notwithstanding any provisions of any general or special 
law to the contrary, the Town of Nantucket may transfer, sell, convey or otherwise dispose of all 

of 2 12 or a portion of a certain parcel of land situated in the Town of Nantucket to the Nantucket Islands 
Land Bank for the purposes pursuant to its enabling legislation for open space, conservation and 
passive recreation purposes, and described as follows: 
• 35 Grove Lane, shown on Tax Assessor’s Map 71 as Parcel 342 
Any such disposition shall be on such terms and conditions as the Select Board deem 
appropriate, which may include the reservation of restrictions and easements, all as shown on a 
map filed with the Office of the Town Clerk. 
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage. 
Or to take any other action related thereto.